Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-17] Court-appointed attorneys.
(a) The court may appoint an attorney to represent a legal parent who is
indigent based on court-established guidelines. The court may also appoint an
attorney to represent another indigent party based on court-established
guidelines, if it is deemed to be in the child's best interest. Attorneys who
are appointed by the court to represent indigent legal parents and other
indigent qualifying parties may be paid by the court, unless the legal parent
or party for whom counsel is appointed has an independent estate sufficient to
pay such fees and costs. The court may order the appropriate legal parent or
party to pay or reimburse the fees and costs of an attorney appointed for the
child or incapacitated adult.

(b) Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the
attorney for an incapacitated adult shall take instructions from the
incapacitated adult's guardian ad litem. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Indigent parents are guaranteed the right to court-appointed
counsel in termination proceedings under the due process clause in article I,
§5 of the Hawaii constitution. Trial courts must appoint counsel for indigent
parents upon the granting of a petition to the department of human services for
temporary foster custody of their children. 131 H. 419, 319 P.3d 338 (2014).

Where the family court did not appoint counsel for petitioner
until more than nineteen months after petitioner's son entered foster custody,
and only five months prior to the hearing that ultimately terminated
petitioner's parental rights, the family court abused its discretion in failing
to appoint counsel earlier in the proceedings. 131 H. 419, 319 P.3d 338
(2014).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next